Utah statutes.
4-9-5.   Weights and measures -- Specifications, tolerances, and technical
data published in National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook
govern.
Unless modified by the department, Handbook 44, Specifications, Tolerances,
and Other Technical Requirements for Weighing and Measuring Devices, National
Institute of Standards and Technology, adopted by the National Conference on
Weights and Measures, including supplements or revisions to Handbook 44, shall
determine the specifications, tolerances, and other technical requirements for
devices used for:
(1)  commercial weighing and measuring;
(2)  law enforcement;
(3)  data gathering; and
(4)  other weighing and measuring purposes.
